Washington statutes.
RCW 43.79.550

Forest resiliency account.

The forest resiliency account is created in the state treasury. Revenues to the account shall consist of appropriations and transfers by the legislature and all other funding directed for deposit into the account. Moneys in the account may be spent only after appropriation. Expenditures from the account are dedicated to activities that include but are not limited to forest health, carbon sequestration, and any other activity that helps protect the forests of Washington.

[ 2022 c 157 s 4. Prior: 2021 c 334 s 958.]

NOTES:

Conflict with federal requirements—Effective date—2021 c 334: See notes following RCW 43.79.555.